Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2897.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 427.18a of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Every licensed medical marijuana dispensary shall post and
display at all times a printed sign with the minimum height of eight
ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 2897 Page 1

and one-half (8 1/2) inches and a minimum width of eleven (11)
inches, with at least a 48-point font for the text, near the cash
register or place of checkout and at least two other highly visible
places in the medical marijuana dispensary. The sign shall read as
follows:
“WARNING: INGESTING THC PRODUCTS WHILE PREGNANT IS NOT HEALTHY
FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF AN UNBORN CHILD.”
B. The signage shall be produced at the expense of the medical
marijuana dispensary licensee.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.”
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives





ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 2897 Page 2

ENGR OSSED HOUSE
BILL NO. 2897 By: Townley of the House

and

Coleman of the Senate



An Act relating to medical marijuana; requiring the
display of certain signage in dispensaries and
businesses; providing contents and requirements of
sign; requiring owners pay cost of signs; providing
for codification; and providing an effective date.


BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 427.30 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Every medical marijuana dispensary or any place medical
marijuana or tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) products are sold shall post
and display at all times a printed sign, with a minimum height of
eight and one-half (8 1/2) inches and a minimum width of eleven (11)
inches with a font size of no less than 48 points for the text, near
the cash register or place of checkout and at least two other highly
visible places in the store, which shall read as follows:
WARNING: INGESTING THC PRODUCTS WHILE PREGNANT IS NOT HEALTHY
FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF AN UNBORN CHILD.
ENGR. H. B. NO. 2897 Page 1

B. The signage shall be produced at the expense of the owner of
the business establishment.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate













ENGR. H. B. NO. 2897 Page 2